California statutes. Public Resources Code
(B) Involvement of community-based organizations and community residents within governance and decisionmaking processes, including in the selection and planning of the project.

(C) Multistakeholder partnerships.

(D) The proposed community resilience center will be accessible and offer eligible services and amenities year round to community residents.

(2) The council may award grants that include funding for technical assistance, including, but not limited to, grant writing support and other application assistance.

(3) Grants for community resilience centers may also be awarded for comprehensive upgrades to model integrated delivery of services.

(4) The council shall publicly announce grant award recipients during a public council meeting.

(d) (1) The council shall adopt guidelines and selection criteria for the awarding of grants under the program. The guidelines and selection criteria shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Prioritization of projects that are located in and benefit under-resourced communities.

(B) Prioritization of projects that represent the statewide geographic diversity and that are inclusive of both rural and urban communities in incorporated and unincorporated areas.

(C) The minimum number of years that each grant award recipient must offer community resilience services.

(2) Guideline and selection criteria development and adoption shall go through a public process that allows for transparency and stakeholder feedback.

(3) In developing draft guidelines and selection criteria, the council shall conduct outreach to disadvantaged communities, disadvantaged unincorporated communities, or low-income communities and encourage comments on the draft guidelines and selection criteria from those communities.

(e) The council shall use not more than 8 percent of the moneys appropriated for purposes of the program for the costs of administering the program.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before January 1, 2025, and annually thereafter until the funds for the program are fully
 expended, the council shall prepare and submit a report on the program to the relevant budget subcommittees of the Legislature and to the Legislative Analyst’s Office. The council shall design the program to enable the collection of necessary data to complete the report, including, but not limited to, collecting outcome information from grant award recipients.

(2) The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Detailed information regarding how the program conducted outreach to raise awareness of grant opportunities for stakeholders in heat-vulnerable communities, which organizations and projects applied for funding, and what selection criteria the council used to award the grants.

(B) A summary of the selected projects, including project costs, locations, and descriptions.

(C) A description of the specific, measurable outcomes achieved by the program, including data on the utilization of the centers including during extreme heat events.

(D) Lessons learned and potential recommendations for improving the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 28.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. Zero-Emission Transit Capital Program [75260. - 75260.]

75260.

(a) The Zero-Emission Transit Capital Program is hereby established and shall be administered by the Transportation Agency.

(b) Funds appropriated for the Zero-Emission Transit Capital Program shall be allocated by the Transportation Agency to regional transportation planning agencies with 50 percent of the moneys available to the program to be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1 of the Public Utilities Code and the other 50 percent to be allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) The Transportation Agency shall allocate funding under this program to regional transportation
 planning agencies subject to the requirements of Section 13987 of the Government Code and the guidelines adopted pursuant to that section.

(d) A regional transportation planning agency may use moneys allocated under the program for the following purposes:

(1) Funding zero-emission transit equipment, including, but not limited to, zero-emission vehicles and refueling infrastructure.

(2) Funding transit operations expenditures that prevent service reduction or elimination in order to maintain or increase transit ridership.

(e) A regional transportation planning agency may only use moneys for the purpose specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) if the expenditure is consistent with a regional short-term financial plan or a long-term financial plan, as
 applicable, approved pursuant to Section 13987 of the Government Code.

(f) In allowing the funds under the program to be available for operating costs, it is the intent of the Legislature for those expenditures to do all of the following:

(1) Provide one-time multiyear bridge funding for transit operators to address operational costs until long-term transit sustainability solutions are identified.

(2) Assist transit operators in preventing service cuts and increasing ridership.

(3) Prioritize the availability of transit for riders who are transit dependent.

(4) Prioritize transit agencies representing a significant percent of the region’s ridership.

(g) By October 31 of each year, a regional transportation planning agency that received funding under the program shall submit a report to the Transportation Agency on the use of those funds during the previous fiscal year. The report shall include all of the following information:

(1) How much funding was used for operating costs.

(2) The number, type, date, and location of zero-emission buses, trains, or other vehicles purchased.

(3) The number, type, data, and location of electric charging stations or hydrogen fueling stations installed.

(4) The nameplate capacity of installed equipment in kilowatts for electric charging stations and kilograms per day for hydrogen fueling stations.

(5) The total costs and the source of funding for vehicles and equipment purchased using these funds.

(h) For purposes of this section, “regional transportation planning agency” means a recipient of funding described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 54, Sec. 6.   (SB 125)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 45. FLUORINATED REFRIGERANTS [76000. - 76008.]

76000.

For purposes of this division, “GWP” means global warming potential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

76002.

The Public Utilities Commission shall consider developing a strategy for including low-GWP refrigerants in equipment funded by the energy efficiency programs overseen by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

76004.

The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall identify opportunities to assess the energy efficiency performance for low-GWP alternatives for current fluorinated-gas-based appliances and equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

76006.

The Department of Community Services and Development shall consider integrating low GWP as part of its ongoing administration of energy efficiency programs for household appliances, including, but not limited to, the Energy Efficiency Low-Income Weatherization Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

76008.

(a) (1) The Fluorinated Gases Emission Reduction Incentive Program is hereby established to be administered by the State Air Resources Board to promote the adoption of refrigerant technologies to achieve short- and long-term climate benefits, energy efficiency, and other cobenefits.

(2) Moneys for the program shall be available to the State Air Resources Board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, including, but not limited to, moneys from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, created pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code.

(b) The state board may contract with a third party to administer this section.

(c) Eligible applicants shall be users of systems of refrigerant technologies.

(d) When awarding incentives, the State Air Resources Board shall prioritize both of the following:

(1) Low-GWP alternatives that maximize emissions reductions and focus on key cooling sectors where technology is commercially available.

(2) The use of low-GWP alternatives in new technologies for which higher upfront costs, compared with hydrofluorocarbon systems, have been identified by the State Air Resources Board as a market impediment.

(e) The program shall include all of the following:

(1) Allow a retailer to apply for funding for multiple stores or
 units.

(2) Identify opportunities for outreach efforts to demonstrate and provide information about low-GWP alternatives in refrigeration and air-conditioning.

(3) Require the professional installation and maintenance of alternative refrigeration and air-conditioning equipment in order to maximize energy efficiency and minimize emissions.

(4) Identify opportunities to increase the recovery, reclamation, or destruction of existing high-GWP refrigerants.

(5) Identify opportunities to offer matching funds to local publicly owned electric and gas utilities that offer their own low-GWP incentive programs.

(6) Comply with federal and state laws regarding the disposal and capture of fluorinated
 gases.

(7) Determine the most environmentally beneficial outcome for the replaced equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 46. CALIFORNIA DROUGHT, WATER, PARKS, CLIMATE, COASTAL PROTECTION, AND OUTDOOR ACCESS FOR ALL ACT OF 2018 [80000. - 80173.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [80000. - 80034.]

80000.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Act of 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80001.

(a) The people of California find and declare all of the following:

(1) From California’s beautiful rivers, streams, coastal shorelines, and other waterways, to our federal, state, local, and regional parks and outdoor settings, to our vast network of trails connecting people with natural landscapes, Californians value the rich diversity of outdoor experiences afforded to this state and its citizens.

(2) Demand for local parks has exceeded available funding by a factor of 8 to 1, with particularly high demand in urban, disadvantaged communities.

(3) Many Californians across the state lack access to safe parks,
 wildlife, trails, and recreation areas, which limits their ability to experience the outdoors, improve their physical and emotional health, exercise, and connect with their communities.

(4) Investments to create and improve parks and recreation areas, and to create trail networks that provide access from neighborhoods to parks, wildlife, and recreational opportunities, will help ensure all Californians have access to safe places to exercise and enjoy recreational activities.

(5) The California Center for Public Health Advocacy estimates that inactivity and obesity cost California over forty billion dollars ($40,000,000,000) annually, through increased health care costs and lost productivity due to obesity-related illnesses, and that even modest increases in physical activity would result in significant savings. Investments in infrastructure improvements such as biking and walking
 trails and pathways, whether in urban or natural areas, are cost-effective ways to promote physical activity.

(6) Continued investments in the state’s parks, wildlife and ecological areas, trails, and natural resources, and greening urban areas will help mitigate the effects of climate change, making cities more livable, and will protect California’s natural resources for future generations.

(7) California’s outdoor recreation economy represents an eighty-seven-billion-dollar ($87,000,000,000) industry, providing over 700,000 jobs and billions of dollars in local and state revenues.

(8) California’s state, local, and regional park system infrastructure and national park system infrastructure are aging, and a significant infusion of capital is required to protect this investment.

(9) There has been a historic underinvestment in parks, trails, and outdoor infrastructure in disadvantaged areas and many communities throughout California.

(10) Tourism is a growing industry in California and remains an economic driver for the more rural parts of the state.

(11) California’s highly variable hydrology puts at risk the state’s supply of clean and safe water. In recent years, California has experienced both the state’s worst drought and also the wettest winter in recorded history.

(12) Extreme weather changes such as prolonged drought, intense heat events, and a changing snowpack are real climate impacts happening right now in California, and these changes increase the need to safeguard water supply for the quality of life for all
 Californians.

(13) Every Californian should have access to clean, safe, and reliable drinking water.

(14) California’s water infrastructure continues to age and deteriorate.

(15) Encouraging water conservation and recycling are commonsense actions to improve California’s water future.

(16) Successfully implementing the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act in collaboration with local government and communities is a key state priority.

(17) Flooding can devastate communities and infrastructure.

(18) Protecting and restoring lakes, rivers, streams, and the state’s diverse ecosystems is a critical part of the state’s water
 future and ensures the quality of life for all Californians.

(19) This division provides funding to implement the California Water Action Plan.

(20) Periodic investments are needed to protect, restore, and enhance our natural resources and parks to ensure all Californians have safe, clean, and reliable drinking water, prevent pollution and disruption of our water supplies, prepare for future droughts and floods, and protect and restore our natural resources for the benefit and enjoyment of our children and future generations.

(b) It is the intent of the people of California that all of the following shall occur in the implementation of this division:

(1) The investment of public funds pursuant to this division will result in public benefits that address
 the most critical statewide needs and priorities for public funding.

(2) In the appropriation and expenditure of funding authorized by this division, priority will be given to projects that leverage private, federal, or local funding or produce the greatest public benefit.

(3) To the extent practicable, a project that receives moneys pursuant to this division will include signage informing the public that the project received funds from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Act of 2018.

(4) To the extent practicable, when developing program guidelines for urban recreation projects and habitat protection or restoration projects, administering entities are encouraged to give favorable consideration to projects that provide urban recreation and protect or restore
 natural resources. Additionally, the entities may pool funding for these projects.

(5) To the extent practicable, a project that receives moneys pursuant to this division will provide workforce education and training, contractor, and job opportunities for disadvantaged communities.

(6) To the extent practicable, priority for funding pursuant to this division will be given to local parks projects that have obtained all required permits and entitlements and a commitment of matching funds, if required.

(7) To the extent practicable, administering entities should measure or require measurement of greenhouse gas emissions reductions and carbon sequestrations associated with projects that receive moneys pursuant to this division.

(8) To the extent
 practicable, as identified in the “Presidential Memorandum--Promoting Diversity and Inclusion in Our National Parks, National Forests, and Other Public Lands and Waters,” dated January 12, 2017, the public agencies that receive funds pursuant to this division will consider a range of actions that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Conducting active outreach to diverse populations, particularly minority, low-income, and disabled populations and tribal communities, to increase awareness within those communities and the public generally about specific programs and opportunities.

(B) Mentoring new environmental, outdoor recreation, and conservation leaders to increase diverse representation across these areas.

(C) Creating new partnerships with state, local, tribal, private, and nonprofit organizations
 to expand access for diverse populations.

(D) Identifying and implementing improvements to existing programs to increase visitation and access by diverse populations, particularly minority, low-income, and disabled populations and tribal communities.

(E) Expanding the use of multilingual and culturally appropriate materials in public communications and educational strategies, including through social media strategies, as appropriate, that target diverse populations.

(F) Developing or expanding coordinated efforts to promote youth engagement and empowerment, including fostering new partnerships with diversity-serving and youth-serving organizations, urban areas, and programs.

(G) Identifying possible staff liaisons to diverse populations.

(9) To the extent practicable, priority for grant funding under this division will be given to a project that advances solutions to prevent displacement if a potential unintended consequence associated with park creation pursuant to the project is an increase in the cost of housing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80002.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Finance Committee created by Section 80162.

(b) “Community access” means engagement programs, technical assistance, or facilities that maximize safe and equitable physical admittance, especially for low-income communities, to natural or cultural resources, community education, or recreational amenities.

(c) “Conservation actions on private lands” means projects with willing landowners that involve the adaptive flexible management or protection of
 natural resources in response to changing conditions and threats to habitat and wildlife. The actions may include the acquisition of conservation interests or fee interests in the land. These projects result in habitat conditions on private lands that, when managed dynamically over time, contribute to the long-term health and resiliency of vital ecosystems and enhance wildlife populations.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(e) “Disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income less than 80 percent of the statewide average.

(f) “Fund” means the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund, created by Section 80032.

(g) “Heavily urbanized city” means a
 city with a population of 300,000 or more.

(h) “Heavily urbanized county” means a county with a population of 3,000,000 or more.

(i) “Interpretation” includes, but is not limited to, a visitor-serving amenity that enhances the ability to understand and appreciate the significance and value of natural, historical, and cultural resources and that may utilize educational materials in multiple languages, digital information, and the expertise of a naturalist or other skilled specialist. 

(j) “Nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit corporation qualified to do business in California and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(k) “Preservation” means
 rehabilitation, stabilization, restoration, conservation, development, and reconstruction, or any combination of those activities. 

(l) “Protection” means those actions necessary to prevent harm or damage to persons, property, or natural, cultural, and historic resources, actions to improve access to public open-space areas, or actions to allow the continued use and enjoyment of property or natural, cultural, and historic resources, and includes site monitoring, acquisition, development, restoration, preservation, and interpretation. 

(m) “Restoration” means the improvement of physical structures or facilities and, in the case of natural systems and landscape features, includes, but is not limited to, projects for the control of
 erosion, stormwater capture and storage or to otherwise reduce stormwater pollution, the control and elimination of invasive species, the planting of native species, the removal of waste and debris, prescribed burning, fuel hazard reduction, fencing out threats to existing or restored natural resources, road elimination, improving instream, riparian, or managed wetland habitat conditions, and other plant and wildlife habitat improvement to increase the natural system value of the property or coastal or ocean resource. Restoration also includes activities described in subdivision (b) of Section 79737 of the Water Code. Restoration projects shall include the planning, monitoring, and reporting necessary to ensure successful implementation of the project objectives. 

(n) “Severely disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income less than 60
 percent of the statewide average.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80004.

An amount that equals not more than 5 percent of the funds allocated for a grant program pursuant to this division may be used to pay the administrative costs of that program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80006.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), up to 10 percent of funds allocated for each program funded by this division may be expended, including, but not limited to, by grants, for planning and monitoring necessary for the successful design, selection, and implementation of the projects authorized under that program. This section shall not otherwise restrict funds ordinarily used by an agency for “preliminary plans,” “working drawings,” and “construction” as defined in the annual Budget Act for a capital outlay project or grant project. Planning may include feasibility studies for environmental site cleanup that would further the purpose of a project that is eligible for funding under this division. Monitoring may include measuring greenhouse gas emissions reductions and carbon sequestration associated
 with program expenditures under this division.

(b) Funds used for planning projects that benefit disadvantaged communities may exceed 10 percent of the funds allocated if the state agency administering the moneys determines that there is a need for the additional funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80008.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), at least 20 percent of the funds available pursuant to each chapter of this division shall be allocated for projects serving severely disadvantaged communities.

(2) At least 15 percent of the funds available pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 80120) and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 80130) shall be allocated for projects serving severely disadvantaged communities.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), up to 10 percent of the funds available pursuant to each chapter of this division may be allocated for technical assistance to disadvantaged communities. The agency
 administering the moneys shall operate a multidisciplinary technical assistance program for disadvantaged communities.

(2) Funds used for providing technical assistance to disadvantaged communities may exceed 10 percent of the funds allocated if the state agency administering the moneys determines that there is a need for the additional funding.

(c) (1) Up to 5 percent of funds available pursuant to each chapter of this division shall, to the extent permissible under the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and with the concurrence of the Director of Finance, be allocated for community access projects that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Transportation.

(B) Physical activity programming.

(C) Resource interpretation.

(D) Multilingual translation.

(E) Natural science.

(F) Workforce development and career pathways.

(G) Education.

(H) Communication related to water, parks, climate, coastal protection, and other outdoor pursuits.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to Chapter 11.1 (commencing with Section 80141) and Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 80150).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80010.

Before disbursing grants pursuant to this division, each state agency that receives funding to administer a competitive grant program under this division shall do the following:

(a) (1) Develop and adopt project solicitation and evaluation guidelines. The guidelines shall include monitoring and reporting requirements and may include a limitation on the dollar amount of grants to be awarded. If the state agency has previously developed and adopted project solicitation and evaluation guidelines that comply with the requirements of this subdivision, it may use those guidelines.

(2) Guidelines adopted pursuant to this
 subdivision shall encourage, where feasible, inclusion of the following project components:

(A) Efficient use and conservation of water supplies.

(B) Use of recycled water.

(C) The capture of stormwater to reduce stormwater runoff, reduce water pollution, or recharge groundwater supplies, or a combination thereof.

(D) Provision of safe and reliable drinking water supplies to park and open-space visitors.

(b) Conduct three public meetings to consider public comments before finalizing the guidelines. The state agency shall publish the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines on its Internet Web site at least 30 days before the public meetings. One meeting shall be conducted at a location
 in northern California, one meeting shall be conducted at a location in the central valley of California, and one meeting shall be conducted at a location in southern California.

(c) For statewide competitive grant programs, submit the guidelines to the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall verify that the guidelines are consistent with applicable statutes and for all the purposes enumerated in this division. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall post an electronic form of the guidelines submitted by state agencies and the subsequent verifications on the Natural Resources Agency’s Internet Web site.

(d) Upon adoption, transmit copies of the guidelines to the fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(e) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria adopted pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80012.

(a) The Department of Finance shall provide for an independent audit of expenditures pursuant to this division. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall publish a list of all program and project expenditures pursuant to this division not less than annually, in written form, and shall post an electronic form of the list on the agency’s Internet Web site in a downloadable spreadsheet format. The spreadsheet shall include information about the location and footprint of each funded project, the project’s objectives, the status of the project, anticipated outcomes, any matching moneys provided for the project by the grant recipient, and the applicable chapter of this division pursuant to which the grant recipient received moneys.

(b) If an audit, required by statute, of any entity that receives funding authorized by this division is conducted pursuant to state law and reveals any impropriety, the California State Auditor or the Controller may conduct a full audit of any or all of the activities of that entity.

(c) The state agency issuing any grant with funding authorized by this division shall require adequate reporting of the expenditures of the funding from the grant.

(d) The costs associated with the publications, audits, statewide bond tracking, cash management, and related oversight activities provided for in this section shall be funded from this division. These costs shall be shared proportionally by each program
 through this division. Actual costs incurred to administer nongrant programs authorized by this division shall be paid from the funds authorized in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80014.

If any moneys allocated pursuant to this division are not encumbered or expended by the recipient entity within the time period specified by the administering agency, the unexpended moneys shall revert to the administering agency for allocation consistent with the applicable chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80016.

To the extent feasible, a project whose application includes the use of services of the California Conservation Corps or certified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5, shall be given preference for receipt of a grant under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80018.

To the extent feasible, a project that includes water efficiencies, stormwater capture for infiltration or reuse, or carbon sequestration features in the project design may be given priority for grant funding under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80020.

Moneys allocated pursuant to this division shall not be used to fulfill any mitigation requirements imposed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80022.

(a) To the extent feasible in implementing this division and except as provided in subdivision (b), a state agency receiving funding under this division shall seek to achieve wildlife conservation objectives through projects on public lands or voluntary projects on private lands. Projects on private lands shall be evaluated based on the durability of the benefits created by the investment. Funds may be used for payments for the protection or creation of measurable habitat improvements or other improvements to the condition of endangered or threatened species, including through the development and implementation of habitat credit exchanges.

(b) This section shall not apply to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80050), Chapter 3 (commencing
 with Section 80060), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 80080), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 80090), Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 80140), Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 80145), or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 80150).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80024.

A state agency that receives funding to administer a grant program under this division shall report to the Legislature by January 1, 2027, on its expenditures pursuant to this division and the public benefits received from those expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80026.

A state conservancy receiving funding pursuant to this division shall endeavor to allocate funds that are complementary, but not duplicative, of authorized expenditures made pursuant to the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Act of 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80028.

Funds provided pursuant to this division, and any appropriation or transfer of those funds, shall not be deemed to be a transfer of funds for the purposes of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2780) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80030.

For grants awarded for projects that serve a disadvantaged community, the administering entity may provide advanced payments in the amount of 25 percent of the grant award to the recipient to initiate the project in a timely manner. The administering entity shall adopt additional requirements for the recipient of the grant regarding the use of the advanced payments to ensure that the moneys are used properly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80032.

(a) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, exclusive of refunding bonds issued and sold pursuant to Section 80172, shall be deposited in the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) Proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division shall be allocated according to the following schedule:

(1) Two billion eight hundred thirty million dollars ($2,830,000,000) for purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80050), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 80060), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 80070), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 80080),
 Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 80090), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 80100), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 80110), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 80120), and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 80130).

(2) Two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) for Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 80140).

(3) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) for Chapter 11.1 (commencing with Section 80141).

(4) Five hundred fifty million dollars ($550,000,000) for Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 80145).

(5) Three hundred ninety million dollars ($390,000,000) for Chapter 11.6 (commencing with Section 80146).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80034.

The Legislature may enact legislation necessary to implement programs funded by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Investments in Environmental and Social Equity, Enhancing California’s Disadvantaged Communities [80050. - 80052.]

80050.

(a) The sum of seven hundred twenty-five million dollars ($725,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the creation and expansion of safe neighborhood parks in park-poor neighborhoods in accordance with the Statewide Park Development and Community Revitalization Act of 2008’s competitive grant program described in Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 5640) of Division 5.

(b) When developing or revising criteria or guidelines for the grant program, the department may give additional consideration to projects that incorporate stormwater capture and storage or otherwise reduce stormwater pollution.

(c) The department shall perform
 its due diligence by conducting a rigorous prequalification process to determine the fiscal and operational capacity of a potential grant recipient to manage a project to do both of the following:

(1) Maximize the project’s public benefit.

(2) Implement the project in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80051.

Of the amount available pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 80050, not less than 20 percent shall be available for the rehabilitation, repurposing, or substantial improvement of existing park infrastructure in communities of the state that will lead to increased use and enhanced user experiences.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80052.

(a) Of the amount available pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 80050, to correct historic underinvestments in the central valley, Inland Empire, gateway, rural, and desert communities, the sum of forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000) shall be available for local park creation and improvement grants to the communities identified by the department as park deficient within those areas for active recreational projects, including aquatic centers, to encourage youth health, fitness, and recreational pursuits. Projects that include the partial or full donation of land, materials, or volunteer services and that demonstrate collaborations of multiple entities and the leveraging of scarce resources may be given consideration. Entities that receive a grant under this section may also be eligible to receive
 other grants under subdivision (a) of Section 80050.
